Georgia, session 2025_26, HB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-3-411 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to tuition equalization grants at private colleges and universities, is amended by
revising division (2)(B)(i) as follows:
"(B)(i) A qualified proprietary institution of higher education located in this state
which is a baccalaureate degree-granting institution of higher education; which is
accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools; which is not a Bible
school or college (or, at the graduate level, a school or college of theology or
divinity); which admits as regular students only persons who have a high school
diploma, a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or a degree from
an accredited postsecondary institution; whose students are eligible to participate in
H. B. 693
- 1 -

LC 61 0192
the federal Pell Grant program; which has been reviewed and approved for operation
and for receipt of tuition equalization grant funds by the Georgia Nonpublic
Postsecondary Education Commission; which is domiciled and incorporated in the
State of Georgia; which has been in existence in the State of Georgia for at least ten
years located in this state since on or before January 1, 2015; and which met all of the
requirements of this subparagraph by January 1, 2011 2015; provided, however, that
the criteria for approval for receipt of tuition equalization grant funds shall include but
not be limited to areas of course study,; quality of academic instruction,; student
placement rate,; research and library sources, resources; faculty,; support staff,;
financial resources,; physical plant facilities resources, instructional campuses,
facilities, or other physical sites; and support and equipment resources."
SECTION 2.
Said Code section is further amended by redesignating divisions (2)(B)(ii) and (2)(B)(iii) as
(2)(B)(iii) and (2)(B)(iv), respectively, and by adding a new division to subparagraph (B) of
paragraph (2) to read as follows:
"(ii) A qualified nonproprietary institution of higher education located in this state
which is a baccalaureate degree-granting institution of higher education offering a
baccalaureate degree program or programs in nursing; which is accredited by the
Higher Learning Commission; which is accredited by the Commission on Collegiate
Nursing Education; which is not a Bible school or college (or, at the graduate level,
a school or college of theology or divinity); which admits as regular students only
persons who have a high school diploma, a state approved high school equivalency
(HSE) diploma, or a degree from an accredited postsecondary institution; whose
students are eligible to participate in the federal Pell Grant program; which has been
reviewed and approved for operation and for receipt of tuition equalization grant
funds by the Georgia Nonpublic Postsecondary Education Commission; and which
H. B. 693
- 2 -

LC 61 0192
has at least one instructional campus that is physically located in the State of Georgia
for at least ten years as of January 1, 2025; provided, however, that only such
institution's baccalaureate degree program or programs in nursing shall be deemed an
approved school for the purposes of this subpart; and provided, further, that an
institution or program that is deemed an approved school pursuant to this division
shall not be deemed an eligible postsecondary institution as defined in Code Section
20-3-519 or for any purposes provided for in Part 7 of this article, relating to HOPE
scholarships and grants."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 693
- 3 -